Washington statutes.
RCW 43.82.125

Authorized uses for enterprise services account.

The enterprise services account shall be used to pay all costs incurred by the department in the operation of real estate managed under the terms of this chapter. Moneys received into the enterprise services account shall be used to pay rent to the owner of the space for occupancy of which the charges have been made and to pay utility and operational costs of the space utilized by the occupying agency: PROVIDED, That moneys received into the account for occupancy of space owned by the state where utilities and other operational costs are covered by appropriation to the department of enterprise services shall be immediately transmitted to the general fund.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 255; 1998 c 105 s 15; 1965 c 8 s 43.82.125. Prior: 1961 c 184 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1998 c 105: See note following RCW 43.19.025.